Nebraska, session 109, LB113.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 53-123.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-123.01 (1) A manufacturer's license shall allow the manufacture,
storage, and sale of alcoholic liquor to wholesale licensees in this state and
to such persons outside the state as may be permitted by law, except that
nothing in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall prohibit a manufacturer of
beer from distributing tax-paid samples of beer at the premises of a licensed
manufacturer for consumption on the premises. A manufacturer's license issued
pursuant to this section shall be the only license required by the Nebraska
Liquor Control Act for the manufacture and retail sale of beer manufactured on
the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises.
(2)(a) A licensee who or which first obtains a craft brewery license
pursuant to section 53-123.14, holds such license for not less than three
years, and operates a brewpub or microbrewery on the licensed premises of such
craft brewery license shall obtain a manufacturer's license when the
manufacture of beer on the licensed premises exceeds twenty thousand barrels
per year. The manufacturer's license shall authorize the continued retail sale
of beer for consumption on or off the premises but only to the extent the
premises were previously licensed as a craft brewery. The sale of any beer
other than beer manufactured by the licensee, wine, or alcoholic liquor for
consumption on the licensed premises shall require the appropriate retail
license. The holder of such manufacturer's license may continue to operate up
to eight five retail locations which are in operation at the time such
manufacturer's license is issued and shall divest itself from retail locations
in excess of eight five locations. The licensee shall not begin operation at
any new retail location even if the licensee's production is reduced below
twenty thousand barrels per year.
(b) The holder of such manufacturer's license may obtain an annual
catering license pursuant to section 53-124.12, a special designated license
pursuant to section 53-124.11, or an entertainment district license pursuant to
section 53-123.17.
(3) A holder of a manufacturer's license to manufacture spirits may
operate a rickhouse that meets the requirements for a distilled spirit plant
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 5178, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, if such
manufacturer receives authorization from the commission and notifies the
commission of the location of such rickhouse in a manner prescribed by the
commission.
Sec. 2. Section 53-123.14, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
53-123.14 (1) Any person who operates a craft brewery shall obtain a
license pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act. A license to operate a
craft brewery shall permit the production of a maximum of twenty thousand
barrels of beer per year in the aggregate from all physical locations
comprising the licensed premises. A craft brewery may also sell to beer
wholesalers for sale and distribution to licensed retailers. A craft brewery
license issued pursuant to this section shall be the only license required by
the Nebraska Liquor Control Act for the manufacture and retail sale of beer for
consumption on or off the licensed premises, except that the sale of any beer
other than beer manufactured by the craft brewery licensee, wine, or alcoholic
liquor by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises shall require the
appropriate retail license. Any license held by the operator of a craft brewery
shall be subject to the act. A holder of a craft brewery license may obtain an
annual catering license pursuant to section 53-124.12, a special designated
license pursuant to section 53-124.11, an entertainment district license
pursuant to section 53-123.17, or a promotional farmers market special
designated license pursuant to section 53-124.16. For purposes of this section,
licensed premises may include up to eight five separate physical locations.
(2)(a) A holder of a craft brewery license may directly sell for resale up
to two hundred fifty barrels per calendar year of beer produced at its licensed
premises directly to retail licensees located in the State of Nebraska which
hold the appropriate retail license if the holder of the craft brewery license:
(i) Only self-distributes its beer in a territory in which the craft
brewery licensee has not entered into a distribution agreement with a licensed
Nebraska wholesaler for the territory where such retail licensee is located;
-1-

LB113 LB113
2025 2025
(ii) Self-distributes its beer utilizing only persons exclusively and
solely employed by the craft brewery licensee in vehicles exclusively and
solely owned or leased by the craft brewery licensee; and
(iii) Complies with all relevant statutes, rules, and regulations that
apply to Nebraska beer wholesalers regarding distribution of such beer.
(b) A holder of a craft brewery license self-distributing beer in
accordance with subdivision (2)(a) of this section may only self-distribute
beer brewed at its licensed brewery premises and shall not distribute beer
produced by any other licensee.
(3) A holder of a craft brewery license may store and warehouse tax-paid
products produced on such licensee's licensed premises in a designated, secure,
offsite storage facility if the holder of the craft brewery license receives
authorization from the commission and notifies the commission of the location
of the storage facility and maintains, at the craft brewery and at the storage
facility, a separate perpetual inventory of the product stored at the storage
facility. Consumption of alcoholic liquor at the storage facility is strictly
prohibited.
(4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
pertaining to distribution rights of craft brewery licensees.
Sec. 3. Section 53-123.16, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
53-123.16 (1) Any person who operates a microdistillery shall obtain a
license pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act. A license to operate a
microdistillery shall permit the licensee to produce a maximum of one hundred
thousand gallons of liquor per year in the aggregate from all physical
locations comprising the licensed premises. For purposes of this section,
licensed premises may include up to eight five separate physical locations. A
microdistillery may also sell to licensed wholesalers for sale and distribution
to licensed retailers. A microdistillery license issued pursuant to this
section shall be the only license required by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act
for the manufacture and retail sale of microdistilled product for consumption
on or off the licensed premises, except that the sale of any beer, wine, or
alcoholic liquor, other than microdistilled product manufactured by the
microdistillery licensee, by the drink for consumption on the microdistillery
premises shall require the appropriate retail license. Any license held by the
operator of a microdistillery shall be subject to the act. A holder of a
microdistillery license may obtain an annual catering license pursuant to
section 53-124.12, a special designated license pursuant to section 53-124.11,
an entertainment district license pursuant to section 53-123.17, or a
promotional farmers market special designated license pursuant to section
53-124.16. The commission may, upon the conditions it determines, grant to any
microdistillery licensed under this section a special license authorizing the
microdistillery to purchase and to import, from such persons as are entitled to
sell the same, wines or spirits to be used solely as ingredients and for the
sole purpose of blending with and flavoring microdistillery products as a part
of the microdistillation process.
(2) A holder of a microdistillery license may directly sell for resale up
to three five thousand five hundred gallons per calendar year of microdistilled
products produced at its licensed premises directly to retail licensees located
in the State of Nebraska which hold the appropriate retail license if the
holder of the microdistillery license:
(a) Self-distributes its microdistilled products utilizing only persons
employed by the microdistillery licensee; and
(b) Complies with all relevant statutes, rules, and regulations that apply
to Nebraska wholesalers regarding distribution of microdistilled products.
(3) A holder of a microdistillery license may store and warehouse tax-paid
products produced on such licensee's licensed premises in a designated, secure,
offsite storage facility if the holder of the microdistillery license receives
authorization from the commission and notifies the commission of the location
of the storage facility and maintains, at the microdistillery and at the
storage facility, a separate perpetual inventory of the product stored at the
storage facility. Consumption of alcoholic liquor at the storage facility is
strictly prohibited.
(4) A holder of a microdistillery license may operate a rickhouse that
meets the requirements for a distilled spirit plant pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 5178,
as such section existed on January 1, 2024, if such licensee receives
authorization from the commission and notifies the commission of the location
of such rickhouse in a manner prescribed by the commission.
(5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating
to the distribution rights of microdistillery licensees.
Sec. 4. Section 53-123.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-123.17 (1) A local governing body may designate an entertainment
district in which a commons area may be used by retail, craft brewery, and
microdistillery licensees and holders of a manufacturer's license which obtain
an entertainment district license. The local governing body may, at any time,
revoke such designation if it finds that the commons area threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the public or has become a common nuisance. The local
governing body shall file the designation or the revocation of the designation
with the commission.
(2) An entertainment district license allows the sale of alcoholic liquor
for consumption on the premises within the confines of a commons area. The
consumption of alcoholic liquor in the commons area shall only occur during the
-2-

LB113 LB113
2025 2025
hours authorized for sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises
under section 53-179 and while food service is available in the commons area or
is available for sale by at least one holder of an entertainment district
license. Only the holder of an entertainment district license or employees of
such licensee may sell or dispense alcoholic liquor in the commons area.
(3) An entertainment district licensee shall serve alcoholic liquor to be
consumed in the commons area in containers that prominently display displays
the licensee's trade name or logo or some other mark that is unique to the
licensee under the licensee's retail license, craft brewery license,
microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license. An entertainment district
licensee may allow alcohol sold by another entertainment district licensee to
enter the licensed premises of either licensee. No entertainment district
licensee shall allow alcoholic liquor to leave the commons area or the premises
licensed under its retail license, craft brewery license, microdistillery
license, or manufacturer's license.
(4) If the licensed premises of the holder of a license to sell alcoholic
liquor at retail issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124, a craft brewery
license, a microdistillery license, or a manufacturer's license is adjacent to
a commons area in an entertainment district designated by a local governing
body pursuant to this section, the holder of the license may obtain an annual
entertainment district license as prescribed in this section. The entertainment
district license shall be issued for the same period and may be renewed in the
same manner as the retail license, craft brewery license, microdistillery
license, or manufacturer's license.
(5) In order to obtain an entertainment district license, a person
eligible under subsection (4) of this section shall:
(a) File an application with the commission upon such forms as the
commission prescribes; and
(b) Pay an additional license fee of three hundred dollars for the
privilege of serving alcohol in the entertainment district payable to the clerk
of the local governing body in the same manner as license fees under
subdivision (4) of section 53-134.
(6) When an application for an entertainment district license is filed,
the commission shall notify the clerk of the local governing body. The
commission shall include with such notice one copy of the application by mail
or electronic delivery. The local governing body and the commission shall
process the application in the same manner as provided in section 53-132.
(7) The local governing body may impose an occupation tax on the business
of an entertainment district licensee doing business within the liquor license
jurisdiction of the local governing body as provided in subdivision (11)(b) of
this section in accordance with section 53-132.
(8) The local governing body with respect to entertainment district
licensees within its liquor license jurisdiction as provided in subdivision
(11)(b) of this section may cancel an entertainment district license for cause
for the remainder of the period for which such entertainment district license
is issued. Any person whose entertainment district license is canceled may
appeal to the commission in accordance with section 53-134.
(9) A local governing body may regulate by ordinance, not inconsistent
with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, any area it designates as an
entertainment district.
(10) Violation of any provision of this section or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section by an
entertainment district licensee may be cause to revoke, cancel, or suspend the
retail license issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124, craft brewery
license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license held by such
licensee.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) (a) Commons area means an area:
(A) (i) Within an entertainment district designated by a local governing
body;
(B) (ii) Shared by authorized licensees with entertainment district
licenses;
(C) (iii) Abutting the licensed premises of such licensees;
(D) With reasonable safety measures in place to protect pedestrians,
including signage, lighting, and reduced motor vehicle speeds when motor
vehicles will be in close proximity to pedestrians (iv) Having limited
pedestrian accessibility by use of a physical barrier, either on a permanent or
temporary basis; and
(E) With a prohibition on the carrying of open alcoholic liquor containers
and the consumption of alcoholic liquor on any open street or highway except
when necessary to cross the same at a designated crosswalk (v) Closed to
vehicular traffic when used as a commons area.
(ii) Commons area may include any area of a public or private right-of-way
if the area otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and
(b) Local governing body means the governing body of the city or village
in which the entertainment district licensee is located.
Sec. 5. Section 53-129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
53-129 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
retail, bottle club, craft brewery, and microdistillery licenses issued under
the Nebraska Liquor Control Act apply only to that part of the premises
described in the application approved by the commission and in the license
issued on the application. For retail and bottle club licenses, only one
-3-

LB113 LB113
2025 2025
location shall be described in each license. For craft brewery and
microdistillery licenses, up to eight five separate physical locations may be
described in each license.
(2) After such license has been granted for the particular premises, the
commission, with the approval of the local governing body and upon proper
showing, may endorse upon the license permission to add to, delete from, or
abandon the premises described in such license and, if applicable, to move from
the premises to other premises approved by the local governing body. In order
to obtain such approval, the retail, bottle club, craft brewery, or
microdistillery licensee shall file with the local governing body a request in
writing and a statement under oath which shows that the premises, as added to
or deleted from or to which such move is to be made, comply in all respects
with the requirements of the act. No such addition, deletion, or move shall be
made by any such licensee until the license has been endorsed to that effect in
writing by the local governing body and by the commission and the licensee
furnishes proof of payment of the renewal fee prescribed in subsection (4) of
section 53-131.
(3)(a) A retail, bottle club, craft brewery, or microdistillery licensee
may apply to the local governing body for a temporary expansion of its licensed
premises to an immediately adjacent area owned or leased by the licensee or to
an immediately adjacent street, parking lot, or alley, not to exceed fifty days
for calendar year 2020 and, for each calendar year thereafter, not to exceed
fifteen days per calendar year. The temporary area shall otherwise comply with
all requirements of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.
(b) The licensee shall file an application with the local governing body
which shall contain (i) the name of the applicant, (ii) the premises for which
a temporary expansion is requested, identified by street and number if
practicable and, if not, by some other appropriate description which definitely
locates the premises, (iii) the name of the owner or lessee of the premises for
which the temporary expansion is requested, (iv) sufficient evidence that the
licensee will carry on the activities and business authorized by the license
for himself, herself, or itself and not as the agent of any other person,
group, organization, or corporation, for profit or not for profit, (v) a
statement of the type of activity to be carried on during the time period for
which a temporary expansion is requested, and (vi) sufficient evidence that the
temporary expansion will be supervised by persons or managers who are agents of
and directly responsible to the licensee.
(c) No temporary expansion provided for by this subsection shall be
granted without the approval of the local governing body. The local governing
body may establish criteria for approving or denying a temporary expansion. The
local governing body may designate an agent to determine whether a temporary
expansion is to be approved or denied. Such agent shall follow criteria
established by the local governing body in making the determination. The
determination of the agent shall be considered the determination of the local
governing body unless otherwise provided by the local governing body.
(d) For purposes of this section, the local governing body shall be that
of the city or village within which the premises for which the temporary
expansion is requested are located or, if such premises are not within the
corporate limits of a city or village, then the local governing body shall be
that of the county within which the premises for which the temporary expansion
is requested are located.
(e) The decision of the local governing body shall be final. If the
applicant does not qualify for a temporary expansion, the temporary expansion
shall be denied by the local governing body.
(f) The city, village, or county clerk shall deliver confirmation of the
temporary expansion to the licensee upon receipt of any fee or tax imposed by
such city, village, or county.
Sec. 6. If any section in this act or any part of any section is declared
invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the validity or
constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 7. Original section 53-123.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 53-123.01, 53-123.14, 53-123.16, and 53-129, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-